District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.08

Content of certificate of title.

(a)

A certificate of title must contain:

(1)

The date the certificate of title was created;

(2)

The name of the owner of record and, if not all owners are listed, an indication that there are additional owners indicated in the files of the Harbor Master;

(3)

The mailing address of the owner of record;

(4)

The hull identification number;

(5)

The information listed in § 50-1541.06(b)(6);

(6)

Except as otherwise provided in § 50-1541.14(b), the name and mailing address of the secured party of record, if any, and if not all secured parties are listed, an indication that there are other security interests indicated in the files of the Harbor Master; and

(7)

All title brands indicated in the files of the Harbor Master covering the vessel, including brands indicated on a certificate of title created by a governmental agency of another jurisdiction and delivered to the Harbor Master.

(b)

This chapter does not preclude the Harbor Master from noting on a certificate of title the name and mailing address of a secured party that is not a secured party of record.

(c)

For each title brand indicated on a certificate of title, the certificate of title must identify the jurisdiction under whose law the title brand was created or the jurisdiction that created the certificate of title on which the title brand was indicated. If the meaning of a title brand is not easily ascertainable or cannot be accommodated on the certificate of title, the certificate of title may state: “Previously branded in (insert the jurisdiction under whose law the title brand was created or whose certificate of title previously indicated the title brand).”.

(d)

If the files of the Harbor Master indicate that a vessel previously was registered or titled in a foreign country, the Harbor Master shall indicate on the certificate of title that the vessel was registered or titled in that country.

(e)

A written certificate of title must contain a form that all owners indicated on the certificate of title may sign to evidence consent to a transfer of an ownership interest to another person. The form must indicate that the making of a false statement is punishable by criminal penalties. The form must include a statement that the statements made are true and correct to the best of each owner’s knowledge, information, and belief.

(f)

A written certificate of title must contain a form for the owner of record to indicate, in connection with a transfer of an ownership interest, that the vessel is hull damaged.

(g)

A written certificate of title must contain a form for a secured party to indicate release of its security interest.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 9, 61 DCR 13083
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.